Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,147
Buildings and facilities; standards, specifications, and exclusions; adoption.

The State Fire Marshal shall adopt and promulgate:

(1) Standards, specifications, and exclusions which are consistent with the most current uniform guidelines and standards set by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended, for (a) buildings and facilities which are newly constructed for first occupancy and (b) alterations of existing buildings and facilities used by the public. For purposes of this section, alterations of an existing building or facility used by the public shall include remodeling, renovation, rehabilitation, reconstruction, historic restoration, changes or rearrangement in structural parts or elements, and changes or rearrangements in the plan or configuration of the height of walls or partitions. Normal maintenance, reroofing, painting, wallpapering, asbestos removal, or changes to mechanical and electrical systems shall not be considered alterations; and

(2) Standards and specifications which are consistent with the most current uniform guidelines and standards set by the federal Fair Housing Act of 1968, as adopted by the State of Nebraska, for new constructed covered multifamily dwellings as defined in section 20-319.

Laws 1974, LB 602, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 72-1122;

Laws 1993, LB 377, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 160;

Laws 2002, LB 93, § 22.